Hawaii statutes.
§155D-1
Definitions. As used in this chapter:

"Administrative
costs" means costs associated with reviewing, approving, and recording
expenditures and completing any reporting requirements associated with the
grant program.

"Department"
means the department of agriculture.

"Milk"
means the lacteal secretion, practically free from colostrums, obtained by the
milking of healthy cows or goats normally produced or marketed through the
channels of the fluid milk trade or for further processing into milk products.

"Poultry
products" means chicken eggs, uncooked in shell, egg-laying chicks, meat
bird chicks, pullets, broilers, fryers, and laying chicken hens.

"Qualified feed
developer" means any person that, at the time of application for and
disbursement of funds under this chapter, is in the business of cultivating
feed crops or manufacturing feed for qualified producers.

"Qualified
producer" means any person that at the time of application for and
disbursement of funds under this chapter is in the business of producing:

(1) Milk from a herd,
located in Hawaii, of not less than ten cows or twenty-five lactating milking
goats;

(2) Poultry products from
a flock, raised and located in Hawaii, of not less than thirty birds;

(3) Pork from a herd,
raised and located in Hawaii, of not less than ten sows;

(4) Beef that is grown,
slaughtered, processed, and marketed in Hawaii. Producers who finish at least
twenty head of beef cattle annually shall be eligible for this program;

(5) Sheep, lambs, or goats
that are grown, slaughtered, processed, and marketed in Hawaii, with current
annual sales of not fewer than thirty sheep, lambs, or goats; or

(6) Fish or crustaceans,
farmed by aquacultural practices, with current annual sales of not less than
two thousand pounds. [L 2007, c 221, pt of §2; am L 2013, c 200, §2; am L 2016,
c 221, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next